Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.160

Costs against assignee.

When the cause of action, after the commencement of the action, by assignment, or in any other manner, becomes the property of a person not a party thereto, and the prosecution or defense is thereafter continued, such person shall be liable for the costs in the same manner as if he or she were a party, and payment thereof may be enforced by execution.

[ 2011 c 336 s 128; Code 1881 s 521; 1877 p 110 s 525; 1869 p 125 s 473; 1854 p 203 s 383; RRS s 490.]